Hawaii statutes.
§174C-7 Commission on water resource
management. (a) There is established within the department a commission
on water resource management consisting of seven members which shall have
exclusive jurisdiction and final authority in all matters relating to
implementation and administration of the state water code, except as otherwise
specifically provided in this chapter.

(b) Five members shall be appointed by the
governor subject to confirmation by the senate in the manner prescribed in
subsection (d). Each member shall have substantial experience in the area of
water resource management; provided that at least one member shall have
substantial experience or expertise in traditional Hawaiian water resource
management techniques and in traditional Hawaiian riparian usage such as those
preserved by section 174C-101. The chairperson of the board of land and
natural resources shall be the chairperson of the commission. The director of
health or the director's designee shall serve as an ex officio[,] voting member.

(c) The members of the commission shall serve
without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel
expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties.

(d) In appointing a member to the commission,
the governor shall select from a list submitted by a nominating committee. The
nominating committee shall be composed of four individuals chosen as follows:
two persons appointed by the governor; one person appointed by the president of
the senate; and one person appointed by the speaker of the house. The
committee shall solicit applications and send to the governor the names of at
least three individuals for each open position.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, the commission shall be subject to sections 26-34, 26-35, and 26-36. [L
1987, c 45, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 184, §1; am L 2016, c 54, §1]

Note

Standardized water audits of public water systems; reports.
L 2016, c 169.

Case Notes

Adverse party's due
process right to fair tribunal in a contested case hearing before commission
not violated by land and natural resources department chairperson also serving
as chairperson of commission under subsection (b) where legislature deemed it
appropriate for one person to serve in both capacities and could override
common law doctrine of incompatible offices which prohibited a person from
serving in a dual capacity. 94 H. 97, 9 P.3d 409.

Department of land
and natural resources chairperson's dual status as chairperson of the
commission and the department did not constitute a reversible due process
violation where, although chairperson should have been precluded from presiding
over the hearing, objecting party did not seek chairperson's disqualification,
and where chairperson's disqualification would have prevented commission from
acting on the case for lack of quorum, the "rule of necessity"
demanded that chairperson preside over the hearing. 94 H. 97, 9 P.3d 409.

In denying permit
application, commission did not wrongfully ignore and abridge petitioner's
"ali‘i rights" where, to the extent that the ali‘i exercised
sovereign authority over water, they received such authority by delegation from
the sovereign; pursuant to constitutional and statutory mandate, final
delegated authority presently resides in the commission, to be exercised for
the benefit of the people of the State. 94 H. 97, 9 P.3d 409.

Where department of
land and natural resources was a party in a contested case proceeding before
the commission, constitutional mandate that tribunal be impartial precluded
chairperson of the commission, who was also chairperson of the department, from
presiding over the hearing. 94 H. 97, 9 P.3d 409.

Law Journals and Reviews

Where Justice Flows Like Water: The Moon Court's
Role in Illuminating Hawai‘i Water Law. 33 UH L. Rev. 537 (2011).

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next